Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 4 LICENSES, CERTIFICATES, AND FEES
33-4-121. Reporting by division - license fee increases - division-managed lands - keep Colorado wild pass - repeal.

By November 1, 2019, and by November 1 of each year thereafter, the division shall prepare a written report on:
(1) (a) (I) By November 1, 2019, and by November 1 of each year thereafter, the division shall prepare a written report on:

The impact that license fee increases, as established on August 8, 2018, or by the commission pursuant to section 33-4-102 (1.5)(a), have had on the total number of sales of licenses;

An accounting of program expenditures made with the increased fees and the impact of those expenditures on the achievement of the division's goals and objectives as set forth in section 2 of Senate Bill 18-143, enacted in 2018; and

A list of nonprofit organizations that, in the previous twelve months, received grant money from the sale of state migratory waterfowl stamps for implementation of the North American waterfowl management plan pursuant to section 33-4-102.5 (3)(b) and an explanation of each grant award made.

On or before November 1, 2024, and on or before November 1 of each year thereafter, the division shall prepare a written report to be attached to the written report prepared pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section regarding:

The number of keep Colorado wild passes sold in the prior fiscal year pursuant to section 33-12-108;

An accounting of program expenditures made with the increased enterprise revenue generated from the sale of the keep Colorado wild passes; and

A summary of the effect that those increased expenditures have had on the achievement of the division goals set forth in section 33-12-108 (2)(a)(IV).

The division shall make the report available to the public and, notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), shall send the report to the agriculture, livestock, and water committee in the house of representatives and the agriculture and natural resources committee in the senate, or their successor committees.

On or before March 1, 2022, and on or before March 1, 2025, the division shall present its findings from, and a summary of, the portion of its most recent report prepared pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section to a joint session of the agriculture, livestock, and water committee in the house of representatives and the agriculture and natural resources committee in the senate, or their successor committees.

On or before March 1, 2025, and on or before March 1, 2030, the division shall present its findings from, and a summary of, the portion of its most recent report prepared pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section to a joint session of the agriculture, livestock, and water committee in the house of representatives and the agriculture and natural resources committee in the senate, or their successor committees.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2030; except that subsections (1)(a)(I) and (1)(b)(I) of this section are repealed, effective September 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1335, § 10, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-249), ch. 273, p. 1587, § 3, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.